Russian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Inst +Prep

LEXICON Root						
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

sobak N1FemAnim ;
ryb N1FemAnim ;
ptic N1FemAnim ;
sinic N1FemAnim ;
korov N1FemAnim ;
krysa N1FemAnim ;
zmej N1FemAnim ;
devočk N1FemAnim ;

dorog N1FemInan ;
rek N1FemInan ;
golov N1FemInan ;
dolina N1FemInan ;
tosk N1FemInan ;
mât N1FemInan ;

seno N2NeutInan ;
sito N2NeutInan ;
vino N2NeutInan ;
pivo N2NeutInan ;

kot N2MascAnim ;
robot N2MascAnim ;
mal'čik N2MascAnim ;
lingvist N2MascAnim ;
olen' N2MascAnim ;
medved' N2MascAnim ;

LEXICON N1FemAnim					
+N+Sg+Nom:^a #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^y #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^e #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+N+Sg+Inst:^oj #;
+N+Sg+Prep:^e #;				
+N+Pl+Nom:^y #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Ø #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^am #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^Ø #;
+N+Pl+Inst:^ami #;
+N+Pl+Prep:^ah #;

LEXICON N1FemInan				
+N+Sg+Nom:^a #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^y #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^e #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+N+Sg+Inst:^oj #;
+N+Sg+Prep:^e #;				
+N+Pl+Nom:^y #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Ø #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^am #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^y #;
+N+Pl+Inst:^ami #;
+N+Pl+Prep:^ah #;

LEXICON N2NeutInan					
+N+Sg+Nom:^o #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^a #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^u #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^o #;
+N+Sg+Inst:^om #;
+N+Sg+Prep:^e #;				
+N+Pl+Nom:^a #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Ø #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^am #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^a #;
+N+Pl+Inst:^ami #;
+N+Pl+Prep:^ah #;

LEXICON N2MascAnim					
+N+Sg+Nom:^Ø #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^a #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^u #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^a #;
+N+Sg+Inst:^om #;
+N+Sg+Prep:^e #;				
+N+Pl+Nom:^y #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^ov #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^am #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^ov #;
+N+Pl+Inst:^ami #;
+N+Pl+Prep:^ah #;
